Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-3331
Financial institution; disclosure or release of information; immunity.

A financial institution is not liable under any state or local law to any individual or to the department for disclosure or release of information to the department for the purpose of establishing, modifying, or enforcing a support order or for any other action taken in good faith to comply with the requirements of section 43-3330. Sections 43-3328 to 43-3339 shall not be construed to make a financial institution responsible or liable to any extent for assuring that the department maintains the confidentiality of information disclosed under section 43-3330.

Laws 1997, LB 752, § 31.